Utah statutes.
76-6-203.   Aggravated burglary.

(1)  A person is guilty of aggravated burglary if in attempting, committing, or fleeing from a burglary the actor or another participant in the crime:

(a)  causes bodily injury to any person who is not a participant in the crime;

(b)  uses or threatens the immediate use of a dangerous  weapon against any person who is not a participant in the crime; or

(c)  possesses or attempts to use any explosive or dangerous weapon.

(2)  Aggravated burglary is a first degree felony.

(3)  As used in this section, "dangerous weapon" has the same definition as under Section 76-1-601.

